California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(A) In addition to the screening, vision, dental, and hearing services described in Section 1396d(r)(1)-(4) of Title 42 of the United States Code, EPSDT services include such other necessary health care, diagnostic services, treatment, and other measures described in Section 1396d(a) of Title 42 of the United States Code
 to correct or ameliorate defects and physical and mental illnesses and conditions discovered by the screening services, whether or not those services are covered under the Medi-Cal State plan, in accordance with Section 1396d(r)(5) of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(B) EPSDT services also include all age-specific assessments and services listed under the most current periodicity schedule by the American Academy of Pediatrics (AAP) and Bright Futures, and any other medically necessary assessments and services that exceed those listed by AAP and Bright Futures.

(2) A service is “medically necessary” if it meets the applicable medical necessity standards set forth in Sections 14059.5 and 14184.402.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 67, Sec. 194.   (AB 1170)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Fiscal Provisions [14150. - 14164.]

14150.

Within 60 calendar days of the date that the annual Budget Act is chaptered, the department shall notify the chairpersons of the fiscal committees of each house of the Legislature, the Chairperson and the Vice Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, and appropriate county representatives if the department plans to withhold and not allocate any of the baseline allocation for county Medi-Cal eligibility activities that
 are appropriated for Medi-Cal administration.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1161, Sec. 87.   Effective September 30, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

14151.

Bills for services rendered during the 1970–71 fiscal year to persons other than the beneficiaries under the California Medical Assistance Program submitted to the state by any county which has elected to come within the provisions of Section 14150.1 of the Welfare and Institutions Code are bills against the appropriation for the fiscal year during which the bills are submitted, and shall be submitted not later than 60 days following the start of the 1971–72 fiscal year. The director may, when he finds that delay in the submission of bills was caused by circumstances beyond the control of the county, extend the period of submissions of bills for a period not to extend beyond
 the end of the 1971–72 fiscal year. State general funds of $27,661,452 are made available from the 1971–72 appropriation to cover the state cost of such bills received. In the event such bills received are less than $27,661,452, the balance remaining may be used for the basic or supplemental schedules of benefits.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 577.)
-------------------------------------------

14152.

Bills for services rendered during the 1970–71 fiscal year to beneficiaries under the California Medical Assistance Program are bills against the appropriation for the fiscal year during which the bills are submitted, and shall be submitted not more than two months after the month in which the service is rendered, and shall be in the form prescribed by the director, except that in the event the patient does not identify himself to the provider as a Medi-Cal beneficiary, the provider shall be entitled to submit his statement at any time within 60 days after that date certified by the provider as the date said patient was first identified as a Medi-Cal beneficiary, provided,
 however, that such date certified by the provider as the date the patient was first so identified shall not be later than one year after the month in which the service was rendered. Further, the director may, where he finds that delay in the submission of bills was caused by circumstances beyond the control of the provider, extend the period for submission of bills for a period not to exceed one year. Funds in the amount of $106,269,000 are hereby made available from the 1971–72 appropriation to cover the cost of such 1970–71 services billed during the 1971–72 fiscal year. In the event such bills are less than $106,269,000 the balance remaining may be used for the basic or supplemental schedules of benefits.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 577.)
-------------------------------------------

14153.

Funds shall be advanced monthly to the respective counties for costs of administration of the Medi-Cal program in the manner prescribed in Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 15000).

Funds may be advanced monthly to the respective counties for the costs of care under the provisions of this chapter upon the order of the Director of Finance and the State Director of Health Services utilizing resources made available through the Health Care Deposit Fund. 

County welfare departments shall submit administrative claims for the Medi-Cal program in
 accordance with procedures described in Section 10604.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 611, Sec. 75.   Effective October 7, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

14154.

(a) (1) The department shall establish and maintain a plan whereby costs for county administration of the determination of eligibility for benefits under this chapter will be effectively controlled within the amounts annually appropriated for that administration. The plan, to be known as the County Administrative Cost Control Plan, shall establish standards and performance criteria, including workload, productivity, and support services standards, to which counties shall adhere. The plan shall include standards for controlling eligibility determination costs that are incurred by performing eligibility determinations at county hospitals, or that are incurred due to the outstationing of any other eligibility function. Except as provided in Section 14154.15, reimbursement to a county for outstationed
 eligibility functions shall be based solely on productivity standards applied to that county’s welfare department office.

(2) (A) The plan shall delineate both of the following:

(i) The process for determining county administration base costs, which include salaries and benefits, support costs, and staff development.

(ii) The process for determining funding for caseload changes, cost-of-living adjustments, and program and other changes.

(B) The annual county budget survey document utilized under the plan shall be constructed to enable the counties to provide sufficient detail to the department to support their budget requests.

(3) The plan shall be part of a single
 state plan, jointly developed by the department and the State Department of Social Services, in conjunction with the counties, for administrative cost control for the California Work Opportunity and Responsibility to Kids (CalWORKs), CalFresh, and Medical Assistance (Medi-Cal) programs. Allocations shall be made to each county and shall be limited by and determined based upon the County Administrative Cost Control Plan. In administering the plan to control county administrative costs, the department shall not allocate state funds to cover county cost overruns that result from county failure to meet requirements of the plan. The department and the State Department of Social Services shall budget, administer, and allocate state funds for county administration in a uniform and consistent manner.

(4) The department and county welfare departments shall develop procedures to ensure the data clarity, consistency, and reliability of information
 contained in the county budget survey document submitted by counties to the department. These procedures shall include the format of the county budget survey document and process, data submittal and its documentation, and the use of the county budget survey documents for the development of determining county administration costs. Communication between the department and the county welfare departments shall be ongoing as needed regarding the content of the county budget surveys and any potential issues to ensure the information is complete and well understood by involved parties. Any changes developed pursuant to this section shall be incorporated within the state’s annual budget process by no later than the 2011–12 fiscal year.

(5) The department shall provide a clear narrative description along with fiscal detail in the Medi-Cal estimate package, submitted to the Legislature in January and May of each year, of each component of the county
 administrative funding for the Medi-Cal program. This shall describe how the information obtained from the county budget survey documents was utilized and, if applicable, modified and the rationale for the changes.

(6) Notwithstanding any other law, the department shall develop and implement, in consultation with county program and fiscal representatives, a new budgeting methodology for Medi-Cal county administrative costs that reflects the impact of PPACA implementation on county administrative work. The new budgeting methodology shall be used to reimburse counties for eligibility processing and case maintenance for applicants and beneficiaries.

(A) The budgeting methodology may include, but is not limited to, identification of the costs of eligibility determinations for applicants, and the costs of eligibility redeterminations and case maintenance activities for recipients, for
 different groupings of cases, based on variations in time and resources needed to conduct eligibility determinations. The calculation of time and resources shall be based on the following factors: complexity of eligibility rules, ongoing eligibility requirements, and other factors as determined appropriate by the department. The development of the new budgeting methodology may include, but is not limited to, county survey of costs, time and motion studies, in-person observations by department staff, data reporting, and other factors deemed appropriate by the department.

(B) The new budgeting methodology shall be clearly described, state the necessary data elements to be collected from the counties, and establish the timeframes for counties to provide the data to the state.

(C) The new budgeting methodology developed pursuant to this paragraph shall be implemented no sooner than
 the 2015–16 fiscal year. The department may develop a process for counties to phase in the requirements of the new budgeting methodology.

(D) The department shall provide the new budgeting methodology to the legislative fiscal committees by March 1 of the fiscal year immediately preceding the first fiscal year of implementation of the new budgeting methodology.

(E) To the extent that the funding for the county budgets developed pursuant to the new budget methodology is not fully appropriated in any given fiscal year, the department, with input from the counties, shall identify and consider options to align funding and workload responsibilities.

(F) For purposes of this paragraph, “PPACA” means the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (Public Law 111-148), as amended by the federal Health Care and
 Education Reconciliation Act of 2010 (Public Law 111-152) and any subsequent amendments.

(G) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this paragraph by means of all-county letters, plan letters, plan or provider bulletins, or similar instructions until the time any necessary regulations are adopted. The department shall adopt regulations by July 1, 2017, in accordance with the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. Beginning six months after the implementation of the new budgeting methodology pursuant to this paragraph, and notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, the department shall provide a status report to the Legislature on a semiannual basis, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, until
 regulations have been adopted.

(b) Nothing in this section, Section 15204.5, or Section 18906 shall be construed to limit the administrative or budgetary responsibilities of the department in a manner that would violate Section 14100.1, and thereby jeopardize federal financial participation under the Medi-Cal program.

(c) (1) The Legislature finds and declares
 that, in order for counties to do the work that is expected of them, it is necessary that they receive adequate funding, including adjustments for reasonable annual cost-of-doing-business increases. The Legislature further finds and declares that linking appropriate funding for county Medi-Cal administrative operations, including annual cost-of-doing-business adjustments, with performance standards will give counties the incentive to meet the performance standards and enable them to continue to do the work they do on behalf of the state. It is therefore the Legislature’s intent, upon an appropriation by the Legislature for this purpose, to provide appropriate funding to the counties for the effective administration of the Medi-Cal program at the local level to ensure that counties can reasonably meet the purposes of the performance measures as contained in this section.

(2) It is the intent of the
 Legislature to not appropriate funds for the cost-of-doing-business adjustment for the 2008–09, 2009–10, 2010–11, 2011–12, 2012–13, 2014–15, 2015–16, 2016–17, 2017–18, 2024–25, and 2025–26 fiscal years.

(d) The department is responsible for the Medi-Cal program in accordance with state and federal law. A county shall determine Medi-Cal eligibility in accordance with state and federal law. If in the course of its duties the department becomes aware of accuracy problems in any county, the department shall, within available resources, provide training and technical assistance as appropriate. This section shall not be interpreted to eliminate any remedy otherwise available to the department to
 enforce accurate county administration of the program. In administering the Medi-Cal eligibility process, each county shall meet the following performance standards each fiscal year:

(1) Complete eligibility determinations as follows:

(A) Ninety percent of the general applications without applicant errors and are complete shall be completed within 45 days.

(B) Ninety percent of the applications for Medi-Cal based on disability shall be completed within 90 days, excluding delays by the state.

(2) (A) The department shall establish best-practice guidelines for expedited enrollment of newborns into the Medi-Cal program, preferably with the goal of enrolling newborns within 10 days after the county is informed of the birth. The
 department, in consultation with counties and other stakeholders, shall work to develop a process for expediting enrollment for all newborns, including those born to mothers receiving CalWORKs assistance.

(B) Upon the development and implementation of the best-practice guidelines and expedited processes, the department and the counties may develop an expedited enrollment timeframe for newborns that is separate from the standards for all other applications, to the extent that the timeframe is consistent with these guidelines and processes.

(3) Perform timely annual redeterminations, as follows:

(A) Ninety percent of the annual redetermination forms shall be mailed to the recipient by the anniversary date.

(B) Ninety percent of the annual redeterminations
 shall be completed within 60 days of the recipient’s annual redetermination date for those redeterminations based on forms that are complete and have been returned to the county by the recipient in a timely manner.

(C) Ninety percent of those annual redeterminations where the redetermination form has not been returned to the county by the recipient shall be completed by sending a notice of action to the recipient within 45 days after the date the form was due to the county.

(e) The department shall develop procedures in collaboration with the counties and stakeholder groups for determining county review cycles, sampling methodology and procedures, and data reporting.

(f) On January 1 of each year, each applicable county, as determined by the department, shall report to the department on the county’s results in
 meeting the performance standards specified in this section. The report shall be subject to verification by the department. County reports shall be provided to the public upon written request.

(g) If the department finds that a county is not in compliance with one or more of the standards set forth in this section, the county shall, within 60 days, submit a corrective action plan to the department for approval. The corrective action plan shall, at a minimum, include steps that the county shall take to improve its performance on the standard or standards with which the county is out of compliance. The plan shall establish interim benchmarks for improvement that shall be expected to be met by the county in order to avoid a sanction.

(h) (1) If a county does not meet the performance standards for completing eligibility determinations and redeterminations as
 specified in this section, the department may, at its sole discretion, reduce the allocation of funds to that county in the following year by 2 percent. Any funds so reduced may be restored by the department if, in the determination of the department, sufficient improvement has been made by the county in meeting the performance standards during the year for which the funds were reduced. If the county continues not to meet the performance standards, the department may reduce the allocation by an additional 2 percent for each year thereafter in which sufficient improvement has not been made to meet the performance standards.

(2) No reduction of the allocation of funds to a county shall be imposed pursuant to this subdivision for failure to meet performance standards during any period of time in which the cost-of-doing-business increase is suspended.

(i) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5
 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and except as provided in subparagraph (G) of paragraph (6) of subdivision (a), the department shall, without taking any further regulatory action, implement, interpret, or make specific this section and any applicable federal waivers and state plan amendments by means of all-county letters or similar instructions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 27, Sec. 87.   (SB 164)   Effective June 29, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

14154.1.

Reimbursement for any Medi-Cal county administrative costs shall be made subject to the requirements specified in the County Administrative Cost Control Plan, established pursuant to Section 14154. However, notwithstanding any other provision of law, for applications taken on or after July 1, 1987, and thereafter, the department shall make allocations for Medi-Cal county administrative expenses taking into consideration all Medi-Cal applications. However, if the department determines that a county is inappropriately processing non-Medi-Cal applications through the Medi-Cal process, then the department shall not allocate state general funds for
 nonapproved Medi-Cal applications which exceed a specified level. That level shall be determined by multiplying the county’s number of approved applications by the ratio of nonapproved applications to approved applications processed by the county during the base period used in the cost control plan which is in effect for the fiscal year the inappropriate processing of non-Medi-Cal applications occurred. Reimbursement to Los Angeles County hospitals shall be limited on the same basis.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1046, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

14154.15.

(a) Any county may petition the department for an augmentation of its County Administrative Cost Control Plan in order to implement a plan, as provided for in Section 1105 of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1305), for the outstationing of one or more eligibility workers at all types of outstation locations, as defined in Section 435.904(c)(3) of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations in order to facilitate receipt and processing of applications for Medi-Cal eligibility for pregnant women, infants and children as
 specified by Title XIX of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396 and following). In order to participate pursuant to this section, a county welfare department shall petition under this section in accordance with guidelines established by the department. The petition shall include, but not be limited to, information about the need for outstation workers at alternative sites and the language skills needed by the outstation workers.

(b) In reviewing a petition from a county for an augmentation of its County Administrative Cost Control Plan for outstationing purposes, the department shall take into account the likely success rate of applications processed by the proposed outstationed eligibility workers, the amount of travel and training time required to implement and continue the outstationing plan, and other productivity factors associated with the outstationing plan.

(c) The
 department may approve those proposed augmentations which, based on its review of the outstationing plan, offer potential to increase eligibility determinations and access to Medi-Cal perinatal services by pregnant women and Medi-Cal services by infants and children specified by Title XIX of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C., Sec. 1396 and following). The department shall review the approved plan annually to determine if the plan shall be renewed, altered, discontinued, or incorporated into the county administrative funding base. 

(d) In addition to any augmentations authorized by this section, the department may, at its discretion, advance administrative funding to a county welfare department for which it approves an augmentation of its County Administrative Cost Control Plan, to cover the initial incremental costs of outstationed eligibility workers under this section. 

(e) The
 department shall conduct a one-time outreach plan to educate county welfare directors, county health officers, and county elected officials on the opportunities and advantages of outstationing Medi-Cal eligibility workers to facilitate access by pregnant women to Medi-Cal perinatal services and Medi-Cal eligibility for infants and children.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 294, Sec. 75.   Effective August 18, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

14154.2.

(a) The Legislature finds that ambiguities have arisen regarding payment provisions relating to certain costs incurred in processing Medi-Cal eligibility applications for various fiscal years, and believes the ambiguities should be alleviated by means of legislation clarifying the Legislature’s intent regarding such provisions.

(b) The Legislature recognizes that federal financial participation in the costs of administering the Medi-Cal program is an important element in funding such costs, and desires that federal financial participation be
 pursued and obtained whenever possible. With respect to Medi-Cal administration costs, for eligibility determinations, it is not and has not been the Legislature’s intent to preclude federal financial participation which would otherwise be available from the Health Care Financing Administration.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1227, Sec. 1.   Effective September 27, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

14154.3.

(a) A provision of a Budget Act or other statute shall not be interpreted or applied to limit the amount of federal financial participation, otherwise available under federal law, which may be reimbursable to counties in support of Medi-Cal administration costs for eligibility determinations. A provision of a Budget Act or another statute shall not be interpreted or applied to restrict the amount of federal financial participation for Medi-Cal administration costs, for eligibility determinations, otherwise available under federal law,
 which may be claimed by the department, and, upon receipt from the federal government, transferred by the department to a county.

(b) The Budget Acts referred to in subdivision (a) include, but are not limited to:

(1) Chapter 510 of the Statutes of 1980, including Item 288 of Section 2 thereof.

(2) Chapter 99 of the Statutes of 1981, including Items 426-101-001 and 426-101-890 of Section 2.00 thereof.

(3) Chapter 326 of the Statutes of 1982, including Items 4260-101-001 and 4260-101-890 of Section 2.00 thereof.

(4) Chapter 324 of the Statutes of 1983, including Items 4260-101-001 and 4260-101-890 of Section 2.00 thereof.

(5) Chapter 258 of the Statutes of 1984, including Items 4260-101-001 and 4260-101-890 of Section 2.00 thereof.

(6) Chapter 111 of the Statutes of 1985, including Items 4260-101-001 and 4260-101-890 of Section 2.00 thereof.

(7) Chapter 186 of the Statutes of 1986, including Items 4260-101-001 and 4260-101-890 of Section 2.00 thereof.

Provisions of the Budget Acts listed in paragraphs (1) to (7), inclusive, shall not be interpreted or applied as a prohibition regarding the amount of costs counties may incur for Medi-Cal eligibility administration activities. The provisions of those Budget Acts shall be interpreted and applied as a means of limiting the allocation of state general funds to be paid in support of Medi-Cal eligibility determination activities.

(c) To
 the extent necessary to effectuate the intent of subdivisions (a) and (b), the following Budget Act provisions shall be inoperative:

(1) Provision 17.5 of Item 426-101-890 of Section 2.00 of Chapter 99 of the Statutes of 1981.

(2) The incorporation by reference of Provision 16 of Item 4260-101-001 of Section 2.00 of Chapter 326 of the Statutes of 1982 into Provision 1 of Item 4260-101-890 of that chapter.

(3) The incorporation by reference of Provision 15 of Item 4260-101-001 of Section 2.00 of Chapter 324 of the Statutes of 1983 into Provision 1 of Item 4260-101-890 of Section 2.00 of that chapter.

(d) Sections 14154 and 14154.1 shall not be interpreted or applied to restrict the amount of federal financial participation, not deferred or disallowed by
 federal law or regulation which may be reimbursable to any county for Medi-Cal administration costs for eligibility determinations. The County Administrative Cost Control Plan established pursuant to Section 14154 shall not be interpreted or applied as a prohibition regarding the amount of costs counties may incur for Medi-Cal county administration costs. That plan shall be interpreted and applied only as a means of limiting the allocation of state general funds to be paid in support of those county costs.

(e) Should federal financial participation be deferred or disallowed regarding funds transferred by the department to a county for costs incurred for Medi-Cal eligibility determinations, and that federal financial participation was matched by county expenditures, the county which received those federal funds shall repay the funds in question at such time as the federal deferral or disallowance has been issued. If the federal deferral or
 disallowance is noticed or issued prior to the transfer of the federal funds from the department to a county, the department shall not be responsible for transferring the federal funds to the county until the deferral or disallowance issue regarding these funds has been resolved.

(f) The department shall timely appeal from the federal deferrals or disallowances and the affected county may assist the department in preparing and presenting a pending appeal regarding a federal deferral or disallowance.

(g) Medi-Cal eligibility determination activities are undertaken by counties on behalf of the department. Reasonable and necessary costs incurred by counties relating to the eligibility determination activities shall be recognized as costs incurred by the state for purposes of inclusion in the nonfederal share of Medi-Cal eligibility determination expenditures for claiming federal
 financial participation.

(h) Subdivision (e) shall not apply to agreements between the department and a county executed prior to September 27, 1987.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 179, Sec. 247.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

14154.5.

(a) Each county shall work, on a routine basis, any error alert from the department’s Medi-Cal Eligibility Data System (MEDS). Any alert that affects eligibility or the spend down of excess income that is received by the 10th working day of the month shall be processed in time for the change to be effective the beginning of the following month. Any alert that affects eligibility or the spend down of excess income that
 is received after the 10th working day of the month shall be processed in time for the change to be effective the beginning of the month after the following month. The department shall consult with the County Welfare Directors Association to define those alerts that affect eligibility or the spend down of excess income.

(b) The county shall submit reconciliation files of its Medi-Cal eligible population to the department every three months, based upon a schedule determined by the department and in a format prescribed by the department, to identify any discrepancies between eligibility files in the county records and eligibility as reflected in MEDS. Counties shall be notified of any changes to the standard format for submitting
 reconciliation files sufficiently in advance to allow for budgeting, scheduling, development, testing, and implementation of any required change in county automated eligibility systems.

(c) For those records that are on the county’s files, but not on MEDS, the county shall receive worker alerts from the department that identify these cases, and the county shall fix any data discrepancies. Any worker alert received by the 10th working day of the month shall be processed in time for the change to be effective the beginning of the following month. Any worker alert received after the 10th working day of the month shall be processed in time for the change to be effective the beginning of the month after the following month.

(d) In regard to any record that is on MEDS but not on the county’s file, the county shall either correct the county record or MEDS, whichever is appropriate,
 within the same timeframes specified in subdivision (c).

(e) The department shall terminate a MEDS-eligible record if the person is not eligible on the county’s file when there has been no eligibility update on the MEDS record for six months.

(f) (1) If the department finds that a county is not performing all of the following activities, the county shall, within 60 days, submit a corrective action plan to the department for approval:

(A) Conducting reconciliations as required in subdivision (b).

(B) Processing 95 percent of worker alerts referred to in subdivisions (c) and (d), within the timeframes specified.

(C) Processing 90 percent of the error alerts referred to
 in subdivision (a) that affect eligibility or the spend down of excess income, within the timeframes specified.

(2) The corrective action plan shall, at a minimum, include steps that the county shall take to improve its performance on the requirements with which the county is out of compliance. The plan shall establish interim benchmarks for improvement that shall be expected to be met by the county in order to avoid sanctions.

(g) (1) If the county does not meet the interim benchmarks for improvement standards, the department may, in its sole discretion, reduce the allocation of funds to that county in the following year by 2 percent. Any funds so reduced
 may be restored by the department if, in the determination of the department, sufficient improvement has been made by the county in meeting the performance standards during the year for which the funds were reduced.

(2) No reduction of the allocation of funds to a county shall be imposed pursuant to this subdivision for failure to meet performance standards during any period of time in which the cost-of-doing-business increase is suspended.

(h) The department, in consultation with the County Welfare Directors Association, shall investigate features that could be installed in MEDS to reduce the number of alerts and streamline the reconciliation process.

(i) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department
 may implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of all-county letters, provider bulletins, or similar instructions. Thereafter, the department may adopt regulations in accordance with the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 42, Sec. 154.   (AB 118)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

14157.

There is hereby established a Health Care Deposit Fund from which expenditures of state, county and federal funds for health care and administration under this chapter and Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200) shall be made upon order of the Controller in accordance with certifications made by the director.

The Controller shall deposit in this fund all federal funds as received under the provisions of Title XIX of the Social Security Act and all county funds received under this chapter.

All money in the Health Care Deposit Fund is hereby appropriated, for expenditure for the purposes
 specified in this chapter and Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

14157.6.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any federal and county funds, excluding county funds used for the purposes of Section 4011.1 of the Penal Code, received under the provisions of Section 14157 during each fiscal year, as reimbursement for expenditures for health care services authorized under this chapter made from funds transferred to the Health Care Deposit Fund from the General Fund in prior years, shall be transferred from the Health Care Deposit Fund to the General Fund. When a projected deficiency exists in the Medical Assistance Program, these federal and county funds are hereby appropriated from the General
 Fund to the Health Care Deposit Fund and shall be expended as soon as practicable, but not sooner than 30 days after notification in writing of the necessity therefor, to the chairperson of the committee in each house which considers appropriations, and the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, for the state’s share of payments for medical care and services, county administration, and fiscal intermediary services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 268, Sec. 56.2.   Effective June 30, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

14158.

Funds for the medical assistance program shall be provided annually by appropriation in the Budget Act. The amount of state funds appropriated shall be transferred in such sums as are needed by the Controller from the General Fund to the Health Care Deposit Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 21.)
-------------------------------------------

14158.1.

Effective for expenditures incurred after enactment of any new demonstration project under Article 5.4 (commencing with Section 14180), any federal financial participation that is available under the federal Medicaid Program, or any related waiver or demonstration project, based on the certified public expenditures of designated public hospitals, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 14166.1, or the governmental entities with which they are affiliated, shall be paid to designated
 public hospitals or the governmental entities with which they are affiliated.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 218, Sec. 1.   (AB 1653)   Effective September 8, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

14158.5.

Funds appropriated for purposes of this chapter and Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200), shall fully cover and shall not exceed the state’s share of payments under this chapter and Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200), for the costs of medical care and services, county administration, and fiscal intermediary services. The state’s share of the costs of medical care and services, county administration, and fiscal intermediary services shall be determined pursuant to a plan approved by the Director of Finance and certified to by the director.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 268, Sec. 56.4.   Effective June 30, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

14159.

Commencing with the 2004–05 fiscal year, expenditures for Medi-Cal services and fiscal intermediary and county administration costs included in the department’s budget shall be charged against the appropriation for the fiscal year in which the billing is paid. Commencing July 1, 2004, all 2002–03 fiscal year and prior accrued obligations of the Health Care Deposit Fund shall become obligations of the 2004–05 fiscal year and all moneys available from the 2002–03 fiscal year and prior appropriations shall be reappropriated to the 2004–05 fiscal year for that
 purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 230, Sec. 72.   Effective August 11, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

14159.1.

The provisions of Chapter 577 of the Statutes of 1971 in no way eliminate fiscal obligation incurred prior to July 1, 1971, by any county or the state under Article 5 (commencing with Section 14150) of Chapter 7 of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. After June 30, 1971, all uncollected county share amounts under said Article 5 due the state for prior periods remain an obligation of the county to the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 504.)
-------------------------------------------

14160.

Whenever an amount is or was prior to the effective date of this section, erroneously deposited in the Health Care Deposit Fund, including, but not limited to, duplicate payments and payments in excess of the correct amount, the erroneous amount shall be refunded to the depositor. There is hereby appropriated out of the Health Care Deposit Fund amounts sufficient to pay such refunds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 814.)
-------------------------------------------

14161.

Carriers and providers of Medi-Cal benefits shall be required to utilize uniform accounting and cost-reporting systems as shall be developed and adopted by the department. If any other provision of law provides for uniform accounting and cost-reporting systems for hospitals, the department shall adopt these systems.

Carriers and providers of Medi-Cal benefits shall provide cost
 information to the department as is necessary in order to conduct studies to determine payment for services provided under this chapter, including but not limited to copies of any Medicare cost reports and settlements, and any Medicare audit reports.

Failure to comply with the provisions of this section shall be cause for suspension from participation under this chapter.

The department shall conduct such studies as necessary to determine payments for services provided under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 728, Sec. 207.   (SB 71)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

14162.
